Washington statutes.
RCW 18.19.902

Registered counselor credential abolished.

To practice counseling, all registered counselors must obtain another health profession credential by July 1, 2010. The registered counselor credential is abolished July 1, 2010.

[ 2008 c 135 s 20.]